Nevada, session 83, SB413.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Emergency Management of the
Office of the Military for the Nonprofit Security Grant Pilot
Program created pursuant to subsection 2 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,000,000
2. The Division of Emergency Management of the Office of
the Military shall create the Nonprofit Security Grant Pilot Program.
Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the Division
shall award grants from the money appropriated by subsection 1 for
the Program to organizations in this State that qualify as tax-exempt
pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and are
at risk of threats, attacks and other violent acts to:
(a) Hire permanent or temporary security personnel to protect
the organization, including, without limitation, the physical location
and facilities of the organization and any person on those premises,
-
*SB413*

– 2 –
except for costs to support security associated with travel outside
this State; or
(b) Acquire equipment to improve the security of the physical
location and facilities of the organization to prepare against threats,
attacks and other violent acts.
3. The Division:
(a) May not award a grant from the Program:
(1) For the purpose set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
of more than $10,000.
(2) For the purpose set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
of more than $50,000.
(3) To an organization in a fiscal year for both the purpose
set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 and the purpose set forth in
paragraph (b) of subsection 2.
(b) Shall prioritize the award of grants from the Program to
organizations that:
(1) Are at the greatest risk of threat, attack or other violent
act, as determined by the Division; and
(2) Have not been awarded a grant from the Federal
Government for security personnel or equipment during the
immediately preceding two federal fiscal years.
4. The Division may:
(a) Apply for and accept gifts, grants and donations from any
source for the purpose of carrying out the Program; and
(b) Use not more than 5 percent of the money appropriated by
subsection 1 for a fiscal year to administer the Program.
5. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB413*